Utah statutes.
58-11a-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  Each applicant for licensure as a barber shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of:

(i)  graduation from a licensed or recognized barber school or a licensed or recognized cosmetology/barber school whose curriculum consists of a minimum of 1,000 hours of instruction or the equivalent number of credit hours over a period of not less than 25 weeks;

(ii) (A)  having graduated from a recognized barber school located in a state other than Utah whose curriculum consists of less than 1,000 hours of instruction or the equivalent number of credit hours; and

(B)  having practiced as a licensed barber for a period of not less than 2,000 hours; or

(iii)  having completed an approved barber apprenticeship; and

(e)  meet the examination requirement established by rule.

(2)  Each applicant for licensure as a barber instructor shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation that the applicant is currently licensed as a barber;

(d)  be of good moral character;

(e)  provide satisfactory documentation of completion of:

(i)  an instructor training program conducted by a licensed or recognized school as defined by rule consisting of a minimum of 500 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours; or

(ii)  a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience as a barber; and

(f)  meet the examination requirement established by rule.

(3)  Each applicant for licensure as a barber school shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation:

(i)  of appropriate registration with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;

(ii)  of business licensure from the city, town, or county in which the school is located;

(iii)  that the applicant's physical facilities comply with the requirements established by rule; and

(iv)  that the applicant meets the standards for barber schools, including staff and accreditation requirements, established by rule.

(4)  Each applicant for licensure as a cosmetologist/barber shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of:

(i)  graduation from a licensed or recognized cosmetology/barber school whose curriculum consists of a minimum of 2,000 hours of instruction, with full flexibility within the 2,000 hours, or the equivalent number of credit hours over a period of not less than 50 weeks;

(ii) (A)  having graduated from a recognized cosmetology/barber school located in a state other than Utah whose curriculum consists of less than 2,000 hours of instruction, with full flexibility within the 2,000 hours, or the equivalent number of credit hours; and

(B)  having practiced as a licensed cosmetologist/barber for a period of not less than 4,000 hours; or

(iii)  having completed an approved cosmetology/barber apprenticeship; and

(e)  meet the examination requirement established by rule.

(5)   Each applicant for licensure as a cosmetologist/barber instructor shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation that the applicant is currently licensed as a cosmetologist/barber;

(d)  be of good moral character;

(e)  provide satisfactory documentation of completion of:

(i)  an instructor training program conducted by a licensed or recognized school as defined by rule consisting of a minimum of 1,000 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours; or

(ii)  a minimum of 4,000 hours of experience as a cosmetologist/barber; and

(f)  meet the examination requirement established by rule.

(6)   Each applicant for licensure as a cosmetologist/barber school shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation:

(i)  of appropriate registration with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;

(ii)  of business licensure from the city, town, or county in which the school is located;

(iii)  that the applicant’s physical facilities comply with the requirements established by rule; and

(iv)  that the applicant meets the standards for cosmetology schools, including staff and accreditation requirements, established by rule.

(7)  Each applicant for licensure as an electrologist shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of having graduated from a licensed or recognized electrology school after completing a curriculum of 600 hours of instruction or the equivalent number of credit hours; and

(e)  meet the examination requirement established by rule.

(8)  Each applicant for licensure as an electrologist instructor shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation that the applicant is currently licensed as an electrologist;

(d)  be of good moral character;

(e)  provide satisfactory documentation of completion of:

(i)  an instructor training program conducted by a licensed or recognized school as defined by rule consisting of a minimum of 175 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours; or

(ii)  a minimum of 1,000 hours of experience as an electrologist; and

(f)  meet the examination requirement established by rule.

(9)  Each applicant for licensure as an electrologist school shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation:

(i)  of appropriate registration with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;

(ii)  of business licensure from the city, town, or county in which the school is located;

(iii)  that the applicant's facilities comply with the requirements established by rule; and

(iv)  that the applicant meets the standards for electrologist schools, including staff, curriculum, and accreditation requirements, established by rule.

(10)  Each applicant for licensure as an esthetician shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of one of the following:

(i)  graduation from a licensed or recognized esthetic school or a licensed or recognized cosmetology/barber school whose curriculum consists of not less than 15 weeks of esthetic instruction with a minimum of 600 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours;

(ii)  completion of an approved esthetician apprenticeship; or

(iii) (A)  having graduated from a recognized cosmetology/barber school located in a state other than Utah whose curriculum consists of less than 2,000 hours of instruction with full flexibility within the 2,000 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours; and

(B)  having practiced as a licensed cosmetologist/barber for a period of not less than 4,000 hours; and

(e)  meet the examination requirement established by division rule.

(11)  Each applicant for licensure as a master esthetician shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character; and

(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of one of the following:

(i) (A)  completion of at least 1,200 hours of training or the equivalent number of credit hours over a period of not less than 30 weeks at a licensed or recognized esthetics school; or

(B)  accepting up to 600 hours or credit hours towards the 1,200 hours of training or equivalent number of credit hours from an applicant who has graduated from a licensed or recognized cosmetology/barbering school whose curriculum consists of a minimum of 2,000 hours of instruction with full flexibility within the 2,000 hours, or the equivalent number of credit hours; and

(C)  for practice of lymphatic massage, provide satisfactory documentation to show completion of 200 hours of training or equivalent number of credit hours in lymphatic massage as defined by division rule; or

(ii)  completion of an approved master esthetician apprenticeship;

(iii)  accepting up to 600 hours or credit hours towards the 1,200 hours of training or equivalent number of credit hours from a recognized cosmetology/barber school located in a state other than Utah whose curriculum consists of less than 2,000 hours of instruction or the equivalent number of credit hours; or

(iv) (A)  having graduated from a recognized master esthetics school located in a state other than Utah whose curriculum consists of less than 1,200 hours of instruction, with full flexibility within the 1,200 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours; and

(B)  having practiced as a licensed master esthetician for a period of not less than 4,000 hours; and

(e)  meet the examination requirement established by division rule.

(12)  Each applicant for licensure as an esthetician instructor shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation that the applicant is currently licensed as a master esthetician;

(d)  be of good moral character;

(e)  provide satisfactory documentation of completion of:

(i)  an instructor training program conducted by a licensed or recognized school as defined by rule, consisting of a minimum of 300 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours; or

(ii)  a minimum of 1,000 hours of experience in esthetics; and

(f)  meet the examination requirement established by rule.

(13)  Each applicant for licensure as an esthetics school shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation:

(i)  of appropriate registration with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;

(ii)  of business licensure from the city, town, or county in which the school is located;

(iii)  that the applicant's physical facilities comply with the requirements established by rule; and

(iv)  that the applicant meets the standards for esthetics schools, including staff, curriculum, and accreditation requirements, established by division rule made in collaboration with the board.

(14)  Each applicant for licensure as a nail technician shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character; and

(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of:

(i)  graduation from a licensed or recognized nail technology school or a licensed or recognized cosmetology/barber school whose curriculum consists of not less than 300 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours of not more than eight hours a day and six days a week during the program;

(ii) (A)  having graduated from a recognized nail technology school located in a state other than Utah whose curriculum consists of less than 300 hours of instruction or the equivalent number of credit hours; and

(B)  having practiced as a licensed nail technician for a period of not less than 1,000 hours; or

(iii)  having completed an approved nail technician apprenticeship; and

(e)  meet the examination requirement established by division rule.

(15)  Each applicant for licensure as a nail technician instructor shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation that the applicant is currently licensed as a nail technician;

(d)  be of good moral character;

(e)  provide satisfactory documentation of completion of:

(i)  an instructor training program conducted by a licensed or recognized school as defined by rule consisting of a minimum of 150 hours or the equivalent number of credit hours; or

(ii)  a minimum of 600 hours of experience in nail technology; and

(f)  meet the examination requirement established by rule.

(16)  Each applicant for licensure as a nail technology school shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  provide satisfactory documentation:

(i)  of appropriate registration with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;

(ii)  of business licensure from the city, town, or county in which the school is located;

(iii)  that the applicant's facilities comply with the requirements established by rule; and

(iv)  that the applicant meets the standards for nail technology schools, including staff, curriculum, and accreditation requirements, established by rule.

(17)  Each applicant for licensure under this chapter whose education in the field for which a license is sought was completed at a foreign school may satisfy the educational requirement for licensure by demonstrating, to the satisfaction of the division, the educational equivalency of the foreign school education with a licensed school under this chapter.

(18) (a)  A licensed or recognized school under this section may accept credit hours towards graduation for any profession listed in this section.

(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and consistent with this section, the division may make rules governing the acceptance of credit hours under Subsection (18)(a).

